Utah statutes.
11-14-102.   Definitions.
For the purpose of this chapter:
(1)  "Bond" means any bond authorized to be issued under this chapter,
including municipal bonds.
(2)  "Election results" has the same meaning as defined in Section 20A-1-102.
(3)  "Governing body" means:
(a)  for a county, city, or town, the legislative body of the county, city, or
town;
(b)  for a local district, the board of trustees of the local district;
(c)  for a school district, the local board of education; or
(d)  for a special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special
Service District Act:
(i)  the governing body of the county or municipality that created the special
service district, if no administrative control board has been established
under Section 17D-1-301; or
(ii)  the administrative control board, if one has been established under
Section 17D-1-301 and the power to issue bonds not payable from taxes has been
delegated to the administrative control board.
(4)  "Local district" means a district operating under Title 17B, Limited
Purpose Local Government Entities - Local Districts.
(5) (a)  "Local political subdivision" means a county, city, town, school
district, local district, or special service district.
(b)  "Local political subdivision" does not include the state and its
institutions.
